SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0366 Y 10
SFX 0366 a ach .
SFX 0366 a am .
SFX 0366 a ami .
SFX 0366 a je .
SFX 0366 a o .
SFX 0366 a oho .
SFX 0366 a om .
SFX 0366 a omaj .
SFX 0366 a ow .
SFX 0366 a u .

SFX 0367 Y 37
SFX 0367 0 i .
SFX 0367 0 ich .
SFX 0367 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0367 0 ichmy .
SFX 0367 0 ichu .
SFX 0367 0 ili .
SFX 0367 0 imoj .
SFX 0367 0 imy .
SFX 0367 0 itaj .
SFX 0367 0 itej .
SFX 0367 0 ić .
SFX 0367 0 iće .
SFX 0367 0 ił .
SFX 0367 0 iła .
SFX 0367 0 iło .
SFX 0367 0 iłoj .
SFX 0367 0 iš .
SFX 0367 0 ištaj .
SFX 0367 0 ištej .
SFX 0367 0 išće .
SFX 0367 0 ja .
SFX 0367 0 jach .
SFX 0367 0 jachmoj .
SFX 0367 0 jachmy .
SFX 0367 0 jachu .
SFX 0367 0 jacy .
SFX 0367 0 jenje .
SFX 0367 0 jeny .
SFX 0367 0 ješe .
SFX 0367 0 ještaj .
SFX 0367 0 ještej .
SFX 0367 0 ješće .
SFX 0367 0 ju .
SFX 0367 0 my .
SFX 0367 0 taj .
SFX 0367 0 tej .
SFX 0367 0 će .

SFX 0368 Y 9
SFX 0368 ha hach ..
SFX 0368 ha haj ..
SFX 0368 ha ham ..
SFX 0368 ha hami ..
SFX 0368 ha hej ..
SFX 0368 ha ho ..
SFX 0368 ha hom ..
SFX 0368 ha homaj ..
SFX 0368 ha how ..

SFX 0369 Y 10
SFX 0369 t ta .
SFX 0369 t tach .
SFX 0369 t tam .
SFX 0369 t tami .
SFX 0369 t to .
SFX 0369 t tom .
SFX 0369 t tomaj .
SFX 0369 t tow .
SFX 0369 t tu .
SFX 0369 t će .

SFX 0370 Y 28
SFX 0370 0 e .
SFX 0370 0 ech .
SFX 0370 0 echmoj .
SFX 0370 0 echmy .
SFX 0370 0 echu .
SFX 0370 0 emoj .
SFX 0370 0 emy .
SFX 0370 0 enje .
SFX 0370 0 eny .
SFX 0370 0 etaj .
SFX 0370 0 etej .
SFX 0370 0 eće .
SFX 0370 0 eš .
SFX 0370 0 eše .
SFX 0370 0 eštaj .
SFX 0370 0 eštej .
SFX 0370 0 ešće .
SFX 0370 0 li .
SFX 0370 0 taj .
SFX 0370 0 tej .
SFX 0370 0 u .
SFX 0370 0 ć .
SFX 0370 0 će .
SFX 0370 0 ł .
SFX 0370 0 ła .
SFX 0370 0 łe .
SFX 0370 0 ło .
SFX 0370 0 łoj .

SFX 0371 Y 9
SFX 0371 eń enje ..
SFX 0371 eń ni ..
SFX 0371 eń njach ..
SFX 0371 eń njam ..
SFX 0371 eń nje ..
SFX 0371 eń njemi ..
SFX 0371 eń njomaj ..
SFX 0371 eń njow ..
SFX 0371 eń nju ..

SFX 0372 Y 9
SFX 0372 a ach .
SFX 0372 a am .
SFX 0372 a e .
SFX 0372 a eje .
SFX 0372 a emi .
SFX 0372 a i .
SFX 0372 a omaj .
SFX 0372 a ow .
SFX 0372 a u .

SFX 0373 Y 4
SFX 0373 i imi .
SFX 0373 i o .
SFX 0373 i och .
SFX 0373 i om .

SFX 0374 Y 9
SFX 0374 0 eri .
SFX 0374 0 erjach .
SFX 0374 0 erjam .
SFX 0374 0 erje .
SFX 0374 0 erjemi .
SFX 0374 0 erjomaj .
SFX 0374 0 erjow .
SFX 0374 0 erju .
SFX 0374 0 i .

SFX 0375 Y 13
SFX 0375 er ra ..
SFX 0375 er rach ..
SFX 0375 er raj ..
SFX 0375 er ram ..
SFX 0375 er rami ..
SFX 0375 er rej ..
SFX 0375 er ri ..
SFX 0375 er ro ..
SFX 0375 er rom ..
SFX 0375 er romaj ..
SFX 0375 er row ..
SFX 0375 er ru ..
SFX 0375 er ře ..

SFX 0376 Y 8
SFX 0376 te tach ..
SFX 0376 te tam ..
SFX 0376 te tami ..
SFX 0376 te tomaj ..
SFX 0376 te tow ..
SFX 0376 te tu ..
SFX 0376 te ty ..
SFX 0376 te će ..

SFX 0377 Y 9
SFX 0377 te tach ..
SFX 0377 te tam ..
SFX 0377 te tami ..
SFX 0377 te tey ..
SFX 0377 te tomaj ..
SFX 0377 te tow ..
SFX 0377 te tu ..
SFX 0377 te ty ..
SFX 0377 te će ..

SFX 0378 Y 13
SFX 0378 0 ach .
SFX 0378 0 aj .
SFX 0378 0 am .
SFX 0378 0 ami .
SFX 0378 0 ej .
SFX 0378 0 i .
SFX 0378 0 ija .
SFX 0378 0 ije .
SFX 0378 0 je .
SFX 0378 0 o .
SFX 0378 0 om .
SFX 0378 0 omaj .
SFX 0378 0 ow .

SFX 0379 Y 12
SFX 0379 a ach .
SFX 0379 a aj .
SFX 0379 a am .
SFX 0379 a ami .
SFX 0379 a ej .
SFX 0379 a i .
SFX 0379 a ija .
SFX 0379 a o .
SFX 0379 a om .
SFX 0379 a omaj .
SFX 0379 a ow .
SFX 0379 a u .

SFX 0380 Y 8
SFX 0380 a ach .
SFX 0380 a am .
SFX 0380 a ami .
SFX 0380 a i .
SFX 0380 a omaj .
SFX 0380 a ow .
SFX 0380 a u .
SFX 0380 a y .

SFX 0381 Y 8
SFX 0381 gi gach ..
SFX 0381 gi gam ..
SFX 0381 gi gami ..
SFX 0381 gi go ..
SFX 0381 gi gomaj ..
SFX 0381 gi gow ..
SFX 0381 gi gu ..
SFX 0381 gi ze ..

SFX 0382 Y 9
SFX 0382 a ach .
SFX 0382 a am .
SFX 0382 a ami .
SFX 0382 a i .
SFX 0382 a je .
SFX 0382 a ji .
SFX 0382 a omaj .
SFX 0382 a ow .
SFX 0382 a u .

SFX 0383 Y 11
SFX 0383 0 a-~a .
SFX 0383 0 ach .
SFX 0383 0 am .
SFX 0383 0 e .
SFX 0383 0 ej .
SFX 0383 0 emi .
SFX 0383 0 o .
SFX 0383 0 om .
SFX 0383 0 omaj .
SFX 0383 0 ow .
SFX 0383 0 u .

SFX 0384 Y 10
SFX 0384 a ach .
SFX 0384 a am .
SFX 0384 a ej .
SFX 0384 a emi .
SFX 0384 a i .
SFX 0384 a je .
SFX 0384 a ojo .
SFX 0384 a omaj .
SFX 0384 a ow .
SFX 0384 a u .

SFX 0385 Y 9
SFX 0385 0 ach .
SFX 0385 0 am .
SFX 0385 0 ami .
SFX 0385 0 je .
SFX 0385 0 omaj .
SFX 0385 0 ow .
SFX 0385 0 u .
SFX 0385 0 y .
SFX 0385 0 ě .

SFX 0386 Y 12
SFX 0386 a ach .
SFX 0386 a aj .
SFX 0386 a am .
SFX 0386 a ami .
SFX 0386 a e .
SFX 0386 a ej .
SFX 0386 a je .
SFX 0386 a o .
SFX 0386 a om .
SFX 0386 a omaj .
SFX 0386 a ow .
SFX 0386 a y .

SFX 0387 Y 12
SFX 0387 e ach .
SFX 0387 e aj .
SFX 0387 e am .
SFX 0387 e ami .
SFX 0387 e ea .
SFX 0387 e ej .
SFX 0387 e je .
SFX 0387 e o .
SFX 0387 e om .
SFX 0387 e omaj .
SFX 0387 e ow .
SFX 0387 e y .

SFX 0388 Y 12
SFX 0388 0 ach .
SFX 0388 0 aj .
SFX 0388 0 am .
SFX 0388 0 ami .
SFX 0388 0 ej .
SFX 0388 0 i .
SFX 0388 0 ija .
SFX 0388 0 je .
SFX 0388 0 o .
SFX 0388 0 om .
SFX 0388 0 omaj .
SFX 0388 0 ow .

SFX 0389 Y 9
SFX 0389 ro rach ..
SFX 0389 ro ram ..
SFX 0389 ro rami ..
SFX 0389 ro rje ..
SFX 0389 ro romaj ..
SFX 0389 ro row ..
SFX 0389 ro ru ..
SFX 0389 ro ry ..
SFX 0389 ro ře ..

SFX 0390 Y 29
SFX 0390 měj mějach ...
SFX 0390 měj mějachmoj ...
SFX 0390 měj mějachmy ...
SFX 0390 měj mějachu ...
SFX 0390 měj mějacy ...
SFX 0390 měj měješe ...
SFX 0390 měj měještaj ...
SFX 0390 měj měještej ...
SFX 0390 měj měješće ...
SFX 0390 měj mějtaj ...
SFX 0390 měj mějtej ...
SFX 0390 měj mějće ...
SFX 0390 měj měli ...
SFX 0390 měj měć ...
SFX 0390 měj měće ...
SFX 0390 měj měł ...
SFX 0390 měj měła ...
SFX 0390 měj měłe ...
SFX 0390 měj měło ...
SFX 0390 měj měłoj ...
SFX 0390 měj změja ...
SFX 0390 měj změje ...
SFX 0390 měj změjemoj ...
SFX 0390 měj změjemy ...
SFX 0390 měj změjetaj ...
SFX 0390 měj změjetej ...
SFX 0390 měj změjeće ...
SFX 0390 měj změješ ...
SFX 0390 měj změju ...

SFX 0391 Y 13
SFX 0391 ěd jeda ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedach ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedaj ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedam ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedami ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedej ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedo ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedom ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedomaj ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedow ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedu ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedy ..
SFX 0391 ěd jedźe ..

SFX 0392 Y 12
SFX 0392 0 a .
SFX 0392 0 ach .
SFX 0392 0 am .
SFX 0392 0 e .
SFX 0392 0 ej .
SFX 0392 0 emi .
SFX 0392 0 ije .
SFX 0392 0 o .
SFX 0392 0 om .
SFX 0392 0 omaj .
SFX 0392 0 ow .
SFX 0392 0 u .

SFX 0393 Y 13
SFX 0393 0 ach .
SFX 0393 0 aj .
SFX 0393 0 am .
SFX 0393 0 ami .
SFX 0393 0 ej .
SFX 0393 0 i .
SFX 0393 0 ija .
SFX 0393 0 je .
SFX 0393 0 o .
SFX 0393 0 om .
SFX 0393 0 omaj .
SFX 0393 0 ow .
SFX 0393 0 y .

SFX 0394 Y 36
SFX 0394 ń njacy .
SFX 0394 ń nje .
SFX 0394 ń njech .
SFX 0394 ń njechmoj .
SFX 0394 ń njechmy .
SFX 0394 ń njechu .
SFX 0394 ń njemoj .
SFX 0394 ń njemy .
SFX 0394 ń njenje .
SFX 0394 ń njeny .
SFX 0394 ń njetaj .
SFX 0394 ń njetej .
SFX 0394 ń njeće .
SFX 0394 ń nješ .
SFX 0394 ń nješe .
SFX 0394 ń nještaj .
SFX 0394 ń nještej .
SFX 0394 ń nješće .
SFX 0394 ń nu .
SFX 0394 ń ny .
SFX 0394 ń nych .
SFX 0394 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0394 ń nychmy .
SFX 0394 ń nychu .
SFX 0394 ń nyli .
SFX 0394 ń nyć .
SFX 0394 ń nył .
SFX 0394 ń nyła .
SFX 0394 ń nyło .
SFX 0394 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0394 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0394 ń nyštej .
SFX 0394 ń nyšće .
SFX 0394 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0394 ń ńtej .
SFX 0394 ń ńće .

SFX 0395 Y 29
SFX 0395 eć asć ..
SFX 0395 eć atli ..
SFX 0395 eć atu ..
SFX 0395 eć atł ..
SFX 0395 eć atła ..
SFX 0395 eć atłe ..
SFX 0395 eć atło ..
SFX 0395 eć atłoj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećacy ..
SFX 0395 eć eće ..
SFX 0395 eć ećech ..
SFX 0395 eć ećechmoj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećechmy ..
SFX 0395 eć ećechu ..
SFX 0395 eć ećemoj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećemy ..
SFX 0395 eć ećenje ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeny ..
SFX 0395 eć ećetaj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećetej ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeće ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeš ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeše ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeštaj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećeštej ..
SFX 0395 eć ećešće ..
SFX 0395 eć ećtaj ..
SFX 0395 eć ećtej ..
SFX 0395 eć ećće ..
