SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
Lejna/0366
Lesotha/0368
MC/0385
Mallorca/0380
Maria/0382
Maya/0384
Melbourna/0386
Melbourne/0387
lep/0367
lišeń/0371
luba/0372
ludźi/0373
lět/0369
lěz/0370
magister/0375
maisonette/0376
maisonette/0377
maka/0379
makaron/0378
mangi/0381
marxizm-leninizm/0383
mać/0374
men/0388
metro/0389
min/0393
mineral/0392
miń/0394
mjeć/0395
musette/0376
musette/0377
musicassette/0376
měd/0391
njelep/0367
njelěz/0370
njemiń/0394
njemjeć/0395
njeměj/0390
njepas/0370
njerub/0367
njes/0370
njetřas/0370
njewjez/0370
njezasewjer/0367
ordinal/0392
pas/0370
rub/0367
sažeń/0371
třas/0370
utensil/0392
wesa/0379
wjez/0370
zasewjer/0367
